Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7814.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 21 of the General Laws entitled "FOOD AND DRUGS" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 38
PRESCRIPTION BENEFIT MANAGER ACCOUNTABILITY ACT
21-38-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "Prescription Benefit Manager Accountability
Act".
21-38-2. Definitions.
(a) "Prescription benefit manager" or "PBM" means any person or entity that administers
or manages prescription drug benefits on behalf of a health insurer, health plan, or other third party
payer.
(b) "Prescribing practitioner" means a physician or other health care provider licensed and
authorized under the laws of this state to prescribe prescription medications.
21-38-3. Mandatory fulfillment of prescribed medication.
(a) Whenever a prescribing practitioner prescribes a specific medication for a patient, the
prescription benefit manager or any entity responsible for processing or approving the prescription
shall approve and authorize coverage of that specific medication as written if the prescribing
practitioner submits a notarized letter stating:

(1) The medical necessity for the specific medication prescribed; and
(2) That alternative medications are not as effective or are not clinically appropriate for the
patient.
(b) Upon receipt of the notarized letter described in subsection (a) of this section, the
prescription benefit manager shall not substitute, deny, or require step therapy for a different
medication.
21-38-4. Denial requirements and medical review.
(a) Any denial of a prescribed medication shall be made only after review by a licensed
health care professional with documented medical expertise in the specific medication or the
medical condition for which it is prescribed.
(b) The prescription benefit manager shall document, at the time of denial:
(1) The name, license number, and specialty of the reviewing health care professional;
(2) The relevant medical expertise; and
(3) The clinical basis for the denial.
(c) Such documentation shall be provided to the prescribing practitioner and the patient
upon request.
21-38-5. Enforcement.
(a) Any violation of this chapter shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice and
may be enforced by the attorney general.
(b) The department of health may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement
this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005681
========
LC005681 - Page 2 of 3